trunk/morphology/spellChecker/analyzer/spellcheckUnificado.foma
       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       # delete all tags and special chars in surface forms     #
       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       define Cleanup1  [["@MU"|"@PU"|"@KU"|"@YSI"|"@RI"|"@CHI"|"@RQU"|"@MI"|"@SI"|"@CHA"|"@Vdim"|"@YKU"|"@YU"|"@NTIN"|"@PTI"|"@STI"|"@PA"|"@TA"|"@AS"|"@ALLI"|"@NAWPA"|"@2SUBJ"] -> ""];
       define Cleanup2 ["" <- ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@KU"|"@YSI"|"@RI"|"@CHI"|"@RQU"|"@MI"|"@SI"|"@CHA"|"@Vdim"|"@YKU"|"@YU"|"@NTIN"|"@PTI"|"@STI"|"@PA"|"@TA"|"@AS"|"@ALLI"|"@NAWPA"|"@2SUBJ"]];

############################################################################### 

      #########################
      #                       #
      # PHONETIC RULES        #
      #                       #
      #########################

      define Vowels [a|e|i|o|u|á|é|í|ó|ú|A|E|I|O|U|Á|É|Í|Ó|Ú|"@TA"|{pa}"@PA"|"@PTI"|"@STI"|"@NAWPA"|"@ALLI"];
      define Cons [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|ñ|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|y|z|'|{m}"@MU"|{m}"@MI"|{s}"@SI"|{ch}"@CHA"|{ntin}"@NTIN"|{q}"@PA"|"@AS"];

      #------------------------------------#
      # allow first letter to be uppercase #
      #------------------------------------#

      define UpperCase [ a (->) A,b (->) B,c (->) C,d (->) D,e (->) E,f (->) F,g (->) G,h (->) H,i (->) I,j (->) J,k (->) K,l (->) L,m (->) M,n (->) N,o (->) O,p (->) P,q (->) Q,r (->) R,s (->) S,t (->) T,u (->) U,v (->) V,w (->) W,x (->) X,y (->) Y,z (->) Z,ñ (->) Ñ || .#. _];


      #define Apo [' (->) ’];

      #----------------------------------------------------#
      # allow accent on ultimate syllable in special cases #
      #----------------------------------------------------#    
      define Accent1 [ a (->) á, u (->) ú ||Vowels Cons+ _ [w|y] .#.];
      define Accent2 [ {qa} (->) {qá}, {taq} (->) {táq}, {ri} (->) {rí}|| _  .#.];
      define Accent Accent1 .o. Accent2;
  


############################################################################### 

     ########################################################################
     ##                                                                    ##
     ##               MORPHO-PHONOLOGICAL RULES                            ##
     ##                                                                    ##
     ########################################################################


      ###########
      # NOMINAL #
      ###########

      #------------------------------------------------------------------#
      # possessive -nkuna is ambigous: -n-kuna (3.Sg) or nku-kuna (3.Pl) #
      #------------------------------------------------------------------#

       define 3PossPl  [  "+3.Pl.Poss" (<-) "+3.Sg.Poss" \\  _ "+Pl" ];

       #----------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # possessive -ykuna is ambigous: y-kuna (1.Sg) or yku-kuna (1.Pl.Excl) #
       #----------------------------------------------------------------------#

       define 2PossPl [ "+1.Pl.Excl.Poss" (<-) "+1.Sg.Poss" \\  _ "+Pl" ];

       define PossessivePlural [3PossPl .o. 2PossPl];

       #---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # genitive is -pa after consonant, but may be -q/-p after vowel, optionally? not clear! #
       #---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define GENITIVE [ {pa}"@PA" (->) {p}"@PA"  ||Vowels  _ ];

       #------------------------------------------------#
       # Possessivformen euphon. -ni nach Konsonant     #
       #------------------------------------------------#

       define POSSESSIVE1 [ {@POSS} -> {ni}  || Cons _ ];
       define POSSESSIVE2 [ {@POSS} ->  "" || Vowels _ ];
       define POSSESSIVE POSSESSIVE1 .o. POSSESSIVE2;

       define NounRules GENITIVE .o. POSSESSIVE;


       ##########
       # VERBAL #
       ##########

       #------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # irregular person marking in transitive verbs -su .. -nki (3.Sg > 2.Sg, not 2.Sg > 2.Sg)  #
       # also: -su .. nkichis, -wa ..sun(chis), -wa.. nku, -wa .. -nqaku                          #
       # object will remain underspecified 2.Obj or 1.Obj (instead of specific 1.Pl.Excl/Incl.Obj #
       # where this would be the exact reading)                                                   #
       #------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#

       define TransSubj1 [ "+3.Sg.Subj" <- "+2.Sg.Subj" ||  ["+2.Obj"] ?* _ ]; #sunki
       define TransSubj2 [ "+3.Sg.Subj" <- "+2.Pl.Subj" ||  ["+2.Obj"] ?* _ ]; #sunkichik
       define TransSubj3 [ "+3.Sg.Subj" <- "+1.Pl.Incl.Subj.Fut" ||  ["+1.Obj"] ?+ _ ]; #wasun
       define TransSubj4 [ "+3.Sg.Subj" <- "+1.Pl.Incl.Imp" ||  ["+1.Obj"] ?+ _ ]; #wasun
       define TransSubj5 [ "+3.Sg.Subj" <- "+3.Pl.Subj.Fut" ||  ["+1.Obj"] ?+ _ ]; #wanqaku
       define TransSubj6 [ "+3.Subj" <- "+3.Pl.Subj" ||  ["+1.Obj"] ?+ _ ]; #wanku 

       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # -nkiku as 2.Sg.Subj has to preceded by -wa (-wankiku -> 1.Pl.Excl.Obj, 2.Sg.Subj) #
       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define TransSubj7 [  "@2SUBJ""+2.Sg.Subj" => "+1.Obj" ?+ _ ];

       define VerbRulesUpper  TransSubj1 .o. TransSubj2 .o. TransSubj3 .o. TransSubj4 .o. TransSubj5 .o. TransSubj6 .o. TransSubj7;  


       #---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # '-rqu' repentine --> '-rqa' before '-mu', '-pu' , '-ri' , '-ysi' (and optional (?) '-ru' --> '-ra' before -ku #
       # -rqu may become -rqa also before -cha (verbal diminutive), e.g. qaparqachay (optional?)                       #
       #---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define rqurqa1 [ {rqu}"@RQU"-> {rqa}"@RQU" || _ ?* [{mu}"@MU"|{pu}"@PU"|{ysi}"@YSI"|{chi}"@CHI"|{ri}"@RI"]];
       define rqurqa2 [ {ru}"@RQU"-> {ra}"@RQU" || _ ?* [{mu}"@MU"|{pu}"@PU"|{ysi}"@YSI"|{chi}"@CHI"|{ri}"@RI"]];
       define rqurqa3 [ {rqu}"@RQU"(->) {rqa}"@RQU" || _ [{ku}"@KU"|{cha}"@Vdim"]];
       define rqurqa4 [ {ru}"@RQU" (->) {ra}"@RQU" || _ [{ku}"@KU"|{cha}"@Vdim"]];

       #----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # '-yku' affective --> -yka before '-mu', '-pu', '-ysi', '-chi', '-ri', '-cha' and '-na' #
       #    # resp. '-yu' --> '-ya'                                                             #
       #----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define ykuyka1 [ {yku}"@YKU" -> {yka}"@YKU" || _ ?* [{mu}"@MU"|{pu}"@PU"|{ysi}"@YSI"|{chi}"@CHI"|{ri}"@RI"]];
       define ykuyka2 [ {yu}"@YU" -> {ya}"@YU" || _ ?* [{mu}"@MU"|{pu}"@PU"|{ysi}"@YSI"|{chi}"@CHI"|{ri}"@RI"]];

       #------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # '-mu' translokative --> '-m' before '-pu'                                          #
       #------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define mpuDIR [ {mu}"@MU" -> {m}"@MU"  ||  _ {pu}"@PU" ];

       #---------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # '-pu' regressive --> '-pa' before '-ku' and '-mu'                               #
       #---------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define pupa [ {pu}"@PU" -> {pa}"@PU" ||  _  [{ku}"@KU"|{mu}"@MU"|{m}"@MU"] ];

       #----------------------------------------------------------#
       # '-ku' reflexive --> '-ka' before '-chi', '-pu' and '-mu' #
       #----------------------------------------------------------#
       define kuka [ {ku}"@KU" -> {ka}"@KU" ||  _  ?* [{mu}"@MU"|{m}"@MU"|{chi}"@CHI"|{pu}"@PU"] ];

       define VerbRulesLower rqurqa1 .o. rqurqa2 .o. rqurqa3 .o. rqurqa4 .o. ykuyka1 .o. ykuyka2 .o. mpuDIR .o. pupa .o. kuka;


       ##############
       # AMBIVALENT #
       ##############

       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # evidential suffixes '-mi', '-si', '-cha' get shortened to '-m', '-s', '-ch' after vowel.            #
       # apply rule on complete word form, as these suffixes may be attached directly to the root, and the   #
       # left context has to be known for the rule to match                                                  #
       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#

       define EVID1 [ {mi}"@MI" -> {m}"@MI"  ||Vowels  _ [~$["+Res"]] ];
       define EVID2 [ {si}"@SI" -> {s}"@SI" || Vowels  _ ];
       define EVID3 [ {cha}"@CHA" -> {ch}"@CHA" || Vowels  _ ];

       define AmbiRules EVID1 .o. EVID2 .o. EVID3;



#################################################################################

      #####################################################
      #                                                   #
      # AMBIVALENT SUFFIXES                               #
      # (may be attached to both nominal or verbal forms) #
      #                                                   #
      #####################################################

       source as-1.foma
       source as-2.foma
       source as-3.foma
       source as-4.foma
       source as-5.foma
       source as-6.foma
       source as-7.foma

       source hon-aff.foma
       

       define AS [(HonAff) (AS=1) (HonAff) (AS=2) (AS=3)^{0,2} (HonAff) (AS=4)(HonAff) (AS=5) (AS=6) (AS=7)] ;


####################################################################################

       ##########
       #        #
       # VERBS  #
       #        #
       ##########

       source vroot.foma
         define VRootQ VRootQin;


       define VRoot [VRootQ];

       source v-v-1.foma
       source v-v-2.foma
       source v-v-3.foma
       source v-v-4.foma
       source v-v-5.foma
       source v-v-6.foma
       source v-v-7.foma

       define VerbSuffixes  VerbRulesUpper .o. [V=V=1^{0,4} (HonAff) V=V=2^{0,3} (HonAff) (V=V=1) (HonAff) (V=V=3) (HonAff) (V=V=4)(HonAff) (V=V=5) (HonAff)(V=V=3)  V=V=6 (V=V=7)]  .o. VerbRulesLower ;


#####################################################################################

       #########
       #       #
       # NOUNS #
       #       #
       #########

       source nroot.foma
         define NRootQ NRootQin ;
       source nroot-num.foma
         define NRootNUM NRootNUMin ;
       source nroot-indef.foma
         define NRootINDEF NRootINDEFin ;
       source nroot-cmp-correct.foma
         define NRootCMP NRootCMPin ;

       define NROOT [NRootQ|NRootNUM];

       source n-n-1.foma
       source n-n-2.foma
       source n-n-3.foma
       source n-n-4.foma
       source n-n-5.foma
       source n-n-6.foma
       source n-n-7.foma
       define kamaDist "+Dist" : {kama};

      define NounSuffixes PossessivePlural .o. [(N=N=1) (HonAff) [ N=N=2^{0,2} (HonAff) (kamaDist) (N=N=3) (HonAff) (N=N=4)| N=N=4 N=N=2 ](HonAff) (N=N=5)^{0,3} (HonAff) N=N=6^{0,3} (HonAff) N=N=7^{0,2} (HonAff)]  ;

      define IndefNoun NRootINDEF [ (HonAff)(kamaDist)(N=N=3) (HonAff) (N=N=4) (HonAff) (N=N=5)^{0,3} (HonAff) N=N=6^{0,3} (HonAff) N=N=7^{0,2} (HonAff)]  ;

#####################################################################################

       #################
       #               #
       # INTERJECTIONS #
       #               #
       #################

source interjec.foma

######################################################################################



       ############
       #          #
       # PRONOUNS #
       #          #
       ############
